Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-146
Continuing competency requirements; compliance; waiver; audits.

(1) Each person holding an active credential within the state shall, on or before the date of expiration of his or her credential, comply with continuing competency requirements for his or her profession. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall not renew the credential of any person who has not complied with such requirements.

(2) The department may waive continuing competency requirements, in whole or in part, upon submission by a credential holder of documentation that circumstances beyond his or her control have prevented completion of such requirements. Such circumstances shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) The credential holder has served in the regular armed forces of the United States during part of the credentialing period immediately preceding the renewal date;

(b) The credential holder was first credentialed within the credentialing period immediately preceding the renewal date; or

(c) Other circumstances prescribed by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the appropriate practice act.

(3) Each credential holder shall be responsible for maintaining certificates or records of continuing competency activities.

The department or appropriate board may biennially select, in a random manner, a sample of the renewal applications for audit of continuing competency requirements. Each credential holder selected for audit shall be required to produce documentation of the continuing competency activities. The credential of any person who fails to comply with the conditions of the audit shall expire thirty days after notice and an opportunity for a hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 15;

Laws 1985, LB 250, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 63;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 55;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 34;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 42;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 120;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 48;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-161.10;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 46.